Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF377.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: Section 1. NEW SECTION . 325B.2 Prohibited factors in determining employment status. 1. The deployment, implementation, or use of a motor carrier safety improvement by or as required by a motor carrier, or any of the carrierâs related entities, including the use of such improvement in accordance with a motor carrier transportation contract, as defined in section 325B.1, shall not be considered when determining whether a person is an employee, independent contractor, or jointly employed employee under any state law. 2. For purposes of this section, âmotor carrier safety improvementâ means any device, equipment, software, technology, procedure, training, policy, program, or operational practice intended and primarily used to improve or facilitate compliance Senate File 377, p. 2 with traffic safety laws, including motor carrier safety, safety of a motor vehicle, safety of the operator of a motor vehicle, and safety of other highway users. ______________________________ AMY SINCLAIR President of the Senate ______________________________ PAT GRASSLEY Speaker of the House I hereby certify that this bill originated in the Senate and is known as Senate File 377, Ninety-first General Assembly. ______________________________ W. CHARLES SMITHSON Secretary of the Senate Approved _______________, 2025 ______________________________ KIM REYNOLDS Governor